District of Columbia statutes.
50-1907

Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the Mayor revoking his or her license or denying him or her a license under the authority of this subchapter, may obtain a review thereof in accordance with § 2-510.

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1018, Pub. L. 92-519, § 7
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 101(d)(4), 59 DCR 12957
1981 Ed., § 40-507.
1973 Ed., § 40-1007.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 substituted “his or her license” for “his license”; substituted “denying him or her” for “denying him”; and substituted “this subchapter” for “this chapter.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(d)(4) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(d)(4) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(d)(4) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(d)(4) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.